South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 11-35-1524(D)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) When evaluating pricing for purposes of making an award determination, the procurement officer shall decrease a bidder's price by two percent if: (a) the bidder has a documented commitment from a single proposed first-tier subcontractor to perform some portion of the services expressly required by the solicitation;  and (b) at the time of the bidding, the subcontractor directly employs or has a documented commitment with individuals domiciled in South Carolina that will perform services expressly required by the solicitation and the total direct labor cost to the subcontractor for those individuals to provide those services exceeds twenty percent of bidder's total bid price.; or (b) the bid is submitted by a business owned by a service-disabled veteran residing in this State. For purposes of this subsection, "service-disabled veteran" means a person who served in the active military, naval, or air service, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable or due to disability unless the disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty in the active military, naval, or air service. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----